Vermont, session 2025-2026, H541.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 1972 is amended to read:
§ 1972. SHOWING BALLOT; INTERFERENCE WITH VOTER
(a) A voter who, except in cases of assistance as provided in this title,
allows his or her the voter’s ballot to be seen by another person with an
apparent intention of letting it be known how he or she the voter is about to
vote or makes a false statement to the presiding officer at an election as to his

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.541
2026 Page 2 of 7
or her the voter’s inability to mark his or her the voter’s ballot or places a
distinguishing mark on his or her the voter’s ballot or a person who interferes
with a voter when inside the guard rail or who, within the building in which
the voting is proceeding, endeavors to induce a voter to vote for a particular
candidate, shall be fined $1,000.00.
(b) It shall be the duty of the election officers to see that the offender is
duly prosecuted for a violation of this section.
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. § 1973 is added to read:
§ 1973. INTERFERENCE WITH VOTERS AND ELECTION OFFICIALS
A person shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more
than $2,000.00, or both, if that person intimidates, threatens, coerces, or
attempts to intimidate, threaten, or coerce:
(1) any other person for the purpose of interfering with the right of such
other person to vote or to vote as the voter may choose, or of causing the other
person to vote for, or not to vote for, any candidate for public office at any
election; or
(2) a candidate for public office, a public servant, an election official, or
a public employee for the purpose of interfering with the preparation or
operation of an election.
Sec. 3. 17 V.S.A. chapter 35, subchapter 4 is added to read:
Subchapter 4. Enforcement and Investigation

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.541
2026 Page 3 of 7
§ 2041. ENFORCEMENT
In addition to the other remedies provided in this chapter, a State’s Attorney
or the Attorney General may institute any appropriate action, injunction, or
other proceeding to prevent, restrain, correct, or abate any violation of this
chapter.
§ 2042. CIVILINVESTIGATIONS
(a)(1) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney, whenever there is reason
to believe any person to be or to have been in violation of this chapter, may
examine or cause to be examined by any designated agent or representative
any books, records, papers, memoranda, or physical objects of any nature
bearing upon each alleged violation and may demand written responses under
oath to questions bearing upon each alleged violation.
(2) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may require the
attendance of such person or of any other person having knowledge in the
premises in the county where such person resides or has a place of business or
in Washington County if such person is a nonresident or has no place of
business within the State and may take testimony and require proof material
for that person’s information and may administer oaths or take
acknowledgment in respect of any book, record, paper, or memorandum.
(3) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney shall serve notice of the
time, place, and cause of such examination or attendance or notice of the cause

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.541
2026 Page 4 of 7
of the demand for written responses personally or by certified mail upon such
person at that person’s principal place of business or, if such place is not
known, to that person’s known address. Such notice shall include a statement
that a knowing and intentional violation of this chapter is subject to criminal
prosecution.
(4) Any book, record, paper, memorandum, or other information
produced by any person pursuant to this section shall not, unless otherwise
ordered by a court of this State for good cause shown, be disclosed to any
person other than the authorized agent or representative of the Attorney
General or a State’s Attorney or another law enforcement officer engaged in
legitimate law enforcement activities unless with the consent of the person
producing the same, except that any transcript of oral testimony, written
responses, documents, or other information produced pursuant to this section
may be used in the enforcement of this chapter, including in connection with
any civil action brought under this subchapter or subsection (c) of this section.
(5) Nothing in this subsection is intended to prevent the Attorney
General or a State’s Attorney from disclosing the results of an investigation
conducted under this section, including the grounds for the decision as to
whether to bring an enforcement action alleging a violation of this chapter or
of any rule made pursuant to this chapter.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.541
2026 Page 5 of 7
(6) This subsection shall not be applicable to any criminal investigation
or prosecution brought under the laws of this or any state.
(b)(1) A person upon whom a notice is served pursuant to the provisions of
this section shall comply with its terms unless otherwise provided by the order
of a court of this State.
(2) Any person who, with intent to avoid, evade, or prevent compliance,
in whole or in part, with any civil investigation under this section, removes
from any place; conceals, withholds, or destroys; or mutilates, alters, or by any
other means falsifies any documentary material in the possession, custody, or
control of any person subject to such notice or mistakes or conceals any
information shall be fined not more than $5,000.00.
(c)(1) Whenever any person fails to comply with any notice served upon
that person under this section or whenever satisfactory copying or reproduction
of any such material cannot be done and the person refuses to surrender the
material, the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may file, in the Superior
Court in the county in which the person resides or of that person’s principal
place of business or in Washington County if the person is a nonresident or has
no principal place of business in this State, and serve upon the person a
petition for an order of the court for the enforcement of this section.
(2) Whenever any petition is filed under this section, the court shall
have jurisdiction to hear and determine the matter so presented and to enter

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.541
2026 Page 6 of 7
any order or orders as may be required to carry into effect the provisions of
this section. Any disobedience of any order entered under this section by any
court shall be punished as a contempt of the court.
(d) Any person aggrieved by a civil investigation conducted under this
section may seek relief from Washington Superior Court or the Superior Court
in the county in which the aggrieved person resides. Except for cases the court
considers to be of greater importance, proceedings before Superior Court as
authorized by this section shall take precedence on the docket over all other
cases.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 1972 is amended to read:
§ 1972. SHOWING BALLOT; INTERFERENCE WITH VOTER
(a) A voter who, except in cases of assistance as provided in this title,
allows his or her the voter’s ballot to be seen by another person with an
apparent intention of letting it be known how he or she the voter is about to
vote or makes a false statement to the presiding officer at an election as to his
or her the voter’s inability to mark his or her the voter’s ballot or places a
distinguishing mark on his or her the voter’s ballot or a person who interferes
with a voter when inside the guard rail or who, within the building in which

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.541
2026 Page 7 of 7
the voting is proceeding, endeavors to induce a voter to vote for a particular
candidate, shall be fined $1,000.00.
(b) It shall be the duty of the election officers to see that the offender is
duly prosecuted for a violation of this section.
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. § 1975 is added to read:
§ 1975. INTERFERENCE WITH VOTERS AND ELECTION OFFICIALS
(a) No person shall intentionally or recklessly intimidate, threaten, coerce,
or attempt to intimidate, threaten, or coerce:
(1) any other person for the purpose of:
(A) obstructing the right of the other person to vote or to vote as the
other person may choose; or
(B) causing the other person to vote for, or not to vote for, any
candidate for public office or public question at any election; or
(2) a public servant, an election official, or a public employee for the
purpose of obstructing the administration of an election.
(b) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be imprisoned
not more than two years or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.